District of Columbia statutes.
47-2885.23

Effect of part on prior regulations.

The provisions of this part supplement all other regulations and laws applicable in the District of Columbia. Regulations heretofore in effect in the District of Columbia which are inconsistent with the provisions of this part are hereby superseded with respect to matters covered by this part.

History

Sept. 16, 1980, D.C. Law 3-98, § 24(c), 27 DCR 3528
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-171, § 302, 59 DCR 6190

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 2-2023.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 19-171 enacted this subchapter into law.